Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Board of Directors

48-18-101. Requirement for and duties of board of directors.

Except as provided in subsection (c), each corporation must have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the charter.

A corporation having fifty (50) or fewer shareholders may dispense with or limit the authority of a board of directors by describing in its charter who will perform some or all of the duties of a board of directors; provided, that any such person or persons shall be subject to the same standards of conduct that this chapter imposes on directors in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.01.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, directors and officers, title 48, ch. 58.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-201.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Directors [and Officers] Making Business Judgments in Tennessee: The Business Judgment Rule, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 455 (2013).

Director and Officer Liability, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 599 (1987).

Why a Board? Group Decisionmaking in Corporate Governance, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

48-18-102. Qualifications of directors.

The charter or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the charter or bylaws so prescribe.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.02.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-103.

48-18-103. Number and election of directors.

A board of directors must consist of one (1) or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the charter or bylaws.

The charter or bylaws may provide that the board of directors has power to fix or change the number of directors, including an increase or decrease in the number of directors. Absent such a provision, only the shareholders may fix or change the number of directors, except as provided in subsection (c).

The charter or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time, within the minimum and maximum, by the shareholders or the board of directors; provided, that unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, only the shareholders may change the range for the size of the board or change from a fixed to a variable-range size board or vice versa.

Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders' meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless their terms are staggered under § 48-18-106 or unless their terms are for more than one (1) year as provided by § 48-18-105.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.03.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-402.

48-18-104. Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the charter authorizes dividing the shares into classes or series, the charter may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one (1) or more authorized classes or series of shares. Each class (or classes) or series of shares entitled to elect one (1) or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.04.

48-18-105. Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders' meeting following their election unless their terms are staggered under § 48-18-106, or unless the charter provides for terms of more than one (1) year but not more than three (3) years.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director's term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires at the next shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected.

Despite the expiration of a director's term, the director continues to serve until a successor is elected and qualified or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.05.

48-18-106. Staggered terms for directors.

The charter may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two (2) or three (3) groups, with each group containing one half (½) or one third (1/3) of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders' meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders' meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders' meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders' meeting held thereafter, the directors shall be chosen for a term of two (2) years or three (3) years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.06.

48-18-107. Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering a written resignation to the board of directors, or its chair, or to the secretary of the corporation.

A resignation is effective when the resignation is delivered unless the resignation specifies a later effective date or an effective date determined upon the happening of an event or events. A resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.07; 2012, ch. 1051, § 28.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1303.

48-18-108. Removal of directors.

The shareholders may remove one (1) or more directors with or without cause unless the charter provides that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove the director without cause.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against the director's removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove the director exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove the director.

If so provided by the charter, any or all of the directors may be removed for cause by a vote of a majority of the entire board of directors.

A director may be removed by the shareholders or directors only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of directors.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.08.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Look at Corporate Governance (Lawrence E. Mitchell), 45 Vand. L. Rev. 1263 (1992).

48-18-109. Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

Any court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation; and

Removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If shareholders commence a proceeding under subsection (a), they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.09.

48-18-110. Vacancy on board.

Unless the charter provides otherwise, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors or a vacancy resulting from a removal with or without cause:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under § 48-18-107(b) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.10.

48-18-111. Compensation of directors.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.11.